Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
RESIDENTIAL PROPERTY WHOLESALING
SECTION 1. Definitions. As used in sections 1 to 9 of this 2024 Act:
(1) “Market” means to advertise, or contract with another person  or entity to advertise,
or to solicit purchasers for the purchase of property either publicly or privately.
(2) “Residential property” means real property zoned for residential use, or an existing
condominium unit as defined in ORS 100.005.
(3) “Residential property wholesaler” means any individual who  engages in residential
property wholesaling and is registered as a residential property wholesaler under  section 3
of this 2024 Act.
(4) “Residential property wholesaling” means to market residential  property for which
the marketer has only an equitable interest or an option to  purchase and, at the time of
marketing, the marketer has:
(a) Held such interest or option for fewer than 90 days; and
(b) Invested less than  $10,000 in land development or improvement costs associated with
the residential property.
SECTION 2.
Registration requirement; exemptions. (1) Except as provided in subsections
(4) and (6) of this section,  a person may not engage in residential property wholesaling unless
that person, or, if  that person is an entity, the individual conducting residential property
wholesaling activity on that person’s behalf, is registered as a residential property wholesaler
under section 3 of this 2024 Act.
(2) This section applies to every person who  conducts residential property wholesaling
related to property located in this state.
(3) One act or transaction of residential  property wholesaling is sufficient to constitute
engaging in residential property wholesaling within the meaning of this section.
(4) An individual licensed under  ORS 696.022 may engage in residential property whole-
saling without registering as a residential  property wholesaler only if that individual provides
Enrolled House Bill 4058 (HB 4058-A) Page 1
proper written disclosure to any potential buyers or sellers of all residential  property
wholesale transactions.
(5) For purposes  of this section, the Real Estate Agency shall establish the standards for
proper written disclosure requirements for individuals licensed under ORS 696.022  who en-
gage in residential property wholesaling.
(6) The requirement to register as a residential property wholesaler does not apply to a
person:
(a) Who is licensed under ORS 696.022 and is  engaging in professional real estate activity;
(b) Who is an attorney at law rendering services in the performance of duties  as an at-
torney at law;
(c) Who  acts in the person’s official capacity as a receiver, a conservator, a trustee in
bankruptcy, a personal representative or a trustee, or a regular salaried employee  of the
trustee, acting under a deed of trust, will or trust agreement, provided that the trustee does
not use the trust  agreement as a device to engage in residential property wholesaling with-
out obtaining the necessary registration;
(d) Who acts as attorney in fact under a duly executed power  of attorney in which the
authorized agent is the spouse of the principal, or the child, grandchild,  parent, grandparent,
sibling, aunt, uncle, niece or nephew of the principal or of the spouse of  the principal, au-
thorizing real  estate activity if the power of attorney is recorded in the office of the re-
cording officer for the county  in which the real estate to be sold, leased or exchanged is
located; or
(e) Who acts as attorney in fact under a duly executed  power of attorney from the owner
or purchaser authorizing the supervision of the closing of  or supervision of the performance
of a contract for the sale, lease or exchange of real estate if the  power of attorney was ex-
ecuted prior to July 1, 2002,  in compliance with the requirements of law at the time of exe-
cution or if:
(A) The power of attorney is recorded in the office  of the recording officer for the county
in which the real estate is located;
(B) The power of attorney specifically describes the real estate; and
(C) The person does not use the power of attorney as a device to engage in residential
property wholesaling without obtaining the necessary registration.
SECTION 3.
Residential property wholesaler registration; requirements; rules.  (1) The
Real Estate  Agency may issue a residential property wholesaler registration only to an in-
dividual.
(2) In accordance with any  applicable provisions of ORS chapter 183, the Real Estate
Commissioner shall establish by rule a system to register residential property wholesalers.
Such a system shall include but need not be limited to prescribing:
(a) The form and content of and the times  and procedures for submitting an application
for the issuance or renewal of registration.
(b) The term of the registration and the fee for the  initial issuance and renewal in an
amount that does not exceed the maximum amount described in section 4 of this 2024 Act.
(c) Those actions or circumstances that constitute failure to achieve or maintain  regis-
tration or competency or that otherwise constitute a danger to the public interest and  for
which the commissioner may refuse to issue or renew or may suspend or revoke  a regis-
tration or may impose a penalty.
(3) For an applicant to qualify for registration, the commissioner must receive:
(a) Certification that the applicant has a high school diploma or a certificate for passing
an approved high school equivalency test such as the  General Educational Development
(GED) test or  the international equivalent, or other equivalent education acceptable to the
commissioner;
(b) Certification that the applicant is at least 18 years of age; and
Enrolled House Bill 4058 (HB 4058-A) Page 2
(c) A list of all  entities, business names and assumed business names under which the
applicant has conducted or will conduct residential property wholesaling activity,  along with
evidence that all business names  and assumed business names are registered with the Sec-
retary of State and  all entities, including foreign entities, are authorized by the Secretary
of State to transact business in this state.
(4) Registration for residential property wholesalers shall be granted only if  the applicant
is trustworthy and  competent to conduct residential property wholesaling in such manner
as to safeguard  the interests of the public and only after satisfactory proof has been pre-
sented to the commissioner. As used in this subsection, “satisfactory proof”  includes but is
not limited to a criminal records check of the  applicant under ORS 181A.195. For the purpose
of requesting a state or nationwide criminal records check  under ORS 181A.195, the com-
missioner may require the fingerprints of the applicant.
SECTION 4. The Real Estate Commissioner, with the  approval of the Oregon Department
of Administrative Services, may  prescribe the fees that the Real Estate Agency may charge
for activities listed under this section, subject to the following maximum amounts:
(1) For initial issuance of residential  property wholesaler registration under section 3 of
this 2024 Act, $300; and
(2) For renewal  of residential property wholesaler registration under section 3 of this
2024 Act, $300.
SECTION 5. Disclosure requirements. (1) Residential property wholesalers shall provide
a residential property wholesaler written disclosure:
(a) To any potential  buyers and sellers before entering into a written contract for a
residential property wholesale transaction;
(b) To any individual licensed under ORS 696.022 who is engaged to assist  the residential
property wholesaler in marketing or listing the property;
(c) To any individual licensed under ORS 696.022 who is assisting a potential  buyer in
purchasing the property; and
(d) In all advertising related to the residential property that is the subject of a residential
property wholesale transaction.
(2) For purposes  of this section, the Real Estate Agency shall establish the standards for
proper residential property wholesaler  written disclosure requirements under this section.
The disclosure must be in  at least 10-point bold type, must contain information prescribed
by the Real Estate Commissioner and at a minimum must state  that the residential property
wholesaler or, if applicable, the entity on behalf of  which the residential property wholesaler
is conducting residential property wholesaling:
(a) Is a residential property wholesaler;
(b) Has only an equitable interest in the property being sold;
(c) Does not have legal  title to the property and therefore might be unable to directly
transfer title to the buyer;
(d) Might not be a licensed real estate broker or principal broker and  therefore might
not be permitted to engage in professional real estate activity; and
(e) Might not be a licensed appraisal specialist and therefore might  not be permitted to
provide an opinion as to the value of the property.
(3) A seller or buyer who enters into  a written contract for a residential property
wholesale transaction may cancel the contract without penalty by  delivery of a written no-
tice of cancellation any time  before 12 midnight at the end of the third business day after
the receipt of the residential property wholesaler written disclosure. The right of cancella-
tion granted by this subsection may not be waived. Upon cancellation,  all earnest money or
deposits shall be returned to the person who provided the earnest money or deposit.
(4) If the residential  property wholesaler fails to provide a residential property wholesaler
written disclosure  to the seller before entering into a written contract for a residential
property wholesale transaction, the seller may terminate the contract at any  time without
Enrolled House Bill 4058 (HB 4058-A) Page 3
penalty and retain any earnest money or deposit paid to the seller  or deposited in escrow by
the residential property wholesaler. An escrow agent may disburse the earnest  money or
deposit to the seller without the need  for separate written instructions from the residential
property wholesaler if:
(a) The seller in writing asserts that  the residential property wholesaler written disclo-
sure was not provided to  the seller before entering into the written contract for the resi-
dential property wholesale transaction and demands disbursement to the seller of all deposits
held by the escrow agent; and
(b) The seller  has provided the escrow agent with a written release and indemnification
against all liability arising from the disbursement of the earnest money and deposits to the
seller.
(5) If the residential  property wholesaler fails to provide a residential property wholesaler
written disclosure to the seller or buyer, and if the purchase and sale agreement  is termi-
nated as a result, the wholesaler shall be liable for damages incurred by seller and buyer.
(6) In  any mediation or arbitration proceeding or civil action between buyer and seller,
between buyer and residential property wholesaler or between seller and residential property
wholesaler that arises due to the residential property wholesaler’s failure to provide a resi-
dential property wholesaler written disclosure before entering into a  written contract for a
residential property wholesale transaction as prescribed under this section, the prevailing
party is entitled to recover all reasonable attorney fees, costs and expenses  incurred at trial,
on appeal, at mediation and at arbitration from the residential property wholesaler.
SECTION 6.
Grounds for disciplinary action. The Real Estate  Commissioner may suspend
or revoke registration of any residential property wholesaler,  deny the issuance or renewal
of registration to an  applicant, or prohibit an individual licensed under ORS 696.022 from
engaging in residential property wholesaling as otherwise provided in section 2 (4) of this 2024
Act if the wholesaler, applicant or individual has done any of the following:
(1) Knowingly or negligently pursued a course of material  misrepresentation in matters
related to residential property wholesaling, whether or  not damage or injury resulted, or
knowingly or negligently made any material  misrepresentation or material false promise in
a matter related  to residential property wholesaling if the material misrepresentation or
material false promise created a reasonable probability of  damage or injury, whether or not
damage or injury actually resulted.
(2) Procured or  attempted to procure a residential property wholesaler registration by
fraud, misrepresentation or deceit or by making any material misstatement of fact in an
application for a residential property wholesaler registration.
(3) Violated a provision of section 2 or 5 of this 2024 Act.
(4) Engaged in any act or conduct, whether of the same or  of a different character
specified in this subsection, that constitutes  or demonstrates bad faith, incompetence,
untrustworthiness or dishonest, fraudulent or improper dealings.
SECTION 7.
Investigation. (1) The Real Estate Commissioner may investigate either upon
complaint or otherwise whenever it appears that a  person has conducted residential property
wholesaling in violation of sections 2 to 6 of this 2024 Act.
(2) If upon investigation it appears that the person has violated a provision of sections
2 to 6 of this  2024 Act, the commissioner may, in addition to any other remedies, bring action
in the name and on behalf of the State of Oregon against such person to enjoin  such person
from continuing any act in violation of sections 2 to 6 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 8. Penalties. (1) Knowingly violating any of the provisions  of section 2, 5 or 6
of this 2024 Act is a Class A misdemeanor.
(2) Any officer, director, shareholder, member,  manager or agent of a corporation, lim-
ited liability company, partnership  or association, who personally participates in or is an
accessory to any violation  of section 2, 5 or 6 of this 2024 Act by the corporation, limited li-
Enrolled House Bill 4058 (HB 4058-A) Page 4
ability company, partnership or association, is subject  to the penalties prescribed in sub-
section (1) of this section.
(3) Any person that violates section 2 of  this 2024 Act may be required by the Real Estate
Commissioner to forfeit and pay to the General Fund of the State Treasury a civil  penalty
in an amount determined by the commissioner of:
(a) Not less than $1,000 nor more than $2,500 for the first offense of unregistered resi-
dential property wholesaling activity; and
(b) Not less than $2,500 nor more than $5,000 for the second and subsequent offenses  of
unregistered residential property wholesaling activity.
(4) In addition to the  civil penalty set forth in subsection (3) of this section, any person
that violates section 2 of this  2024 Act may be required by the commissioner to forfeit and
pay to the General Fund of the State  Treasury a civil penalty in an amount determined by
the commissioner, but not to exceed the amount by  which such person profited in any
transaction that violates section 2 of this 2024 Act.
(5) No person engaging in residential property  wholesaling activity may maintain any suit
or action in any of the courts of  this state to enforce any claim arising out of residential
property wholesaling activity without alleging and proving that the person was registered,
or exempt from registering, under section 3 of this 2024 Act.
(6) The civil  penalty provisions of subsections (3) and (4) of this section are in addition
to and not in  lieu of the criminal penalties for unregistered residential property wholesaling
activity provided by subsections (1) and (2) of this section.
(7) For the purposes of subsection (3) of this section, any violation  of section 2 of this
2024 Act that results from a failure of a residential  property wholesaler to renew their reg-
istration within the time allowed by law  constitutes a single offense of residential property
wholesaling activity without registration for each 30-day period after the lapse of registration
during which the individual engages in residential property wholesaling activity. A civil pen-
alty imposed for  a violation of section 2 of this 2024 Act that results from a failure of a
residential property wholesaler to renew their registration within the time allowed by law  is
not subject to the minimum dollar amounts specified in subsection (3) of this section.
(8) Subsection (4) of this section does not apply to a violation  of section 2 of this 2024
Act that results  from a failure of a residential property wholesaler to renew their registra-
tion within the time allowed by law.
(9) Subsection (4) of this section does not apply to a violation  of section 2 of this 2024
Act that results from a failure of an individual licensed under ORS 696.022  to renew a license
within the time allowed by law.
(10) This section does not apply to escrow agents  licensed under ORS 696.511 or to their
employees engaged in rendering escrow services in  the performance of duties as an escrow
agent.
(11) Civil penalties under this section shall be imposed as provided in ORS 183.745.
SECTION 9.
Commissioner’s order against  unregistered residential property wholesaler.
(1) Whenever the Real Estate Commissioner finds that a person is offering to  engage in
residential property wholesaling activity  without registering as a residential property
wholesaler and the person is required to register under section 2 of  this 2024 Act, the com-
missioner may, subject to ORS chapter 183, issue an  order directing the person to cease and
desist from offering to engage in or engaging in residential property wholesaling activity.
(2) A cease and desist order issued under subsection (1) of this section must include:
(a) A statement of the facts constituting the violation.
(b) A provision requiring the person named in the  order to cease and desist from the
violation.
(c) The effective date of the order.
(d) A notice to the person named in the order of the right to a  contested case hearing
under ORS chapter 183.
Enrolled House Bill 4058 (HB 4058-A) Page 5
(3) A cease and desist order issued  under subsection (1) of this section becomes effective
30 days after the date of the order unless the person named in the order requests a hearing
on the order.
SECTION 10.
 ORS 696.010 is amended to read:
696.010. As used in ORS 696.010 to 696.495, 696.600 to 696.785, 696.800  to 696.870, 696.990 and
696.995 and sections 1 to 9 of this 2024 Act , unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Associated  with” means to be employed, engaged or otherwise supervised by, with respect
to the relationship between:
(a) A real estate broker and a principal real estate broker;
(b) A licensed real estate property manager and a principal real estate broker; or
(c) A licensed real estate property manager and another licensed real estate property manager.
(2) “Bank” includes  any bank or trust company, savings bank, mutual savings bank, savings and
loan association or credit union that maintains a head  office or a branch in this state in the ca-
pacity of a bank or trust company, savings  bank, mutual savings bank, savings and loan association
or credit union.
(3)(a) “Branch office” means a business  location, other than the main office designated under
ORS 696.200, where professional real estate activity is  regularly conducted or that is advertised to
the public as a place where professional real estate activity may be regularly conducted.
(b) Model units or temporary structures used solely for the dissemination  of information and
distribution of lawfully required public reports shall not be considered branch offices. A model  unit
means a permanent residential structure  located in a subdivision or development used for such dis-
semination and distribution, so long as the unit is at all times available  for sale, lease, lease option
or exchange.
(4) “Business day” means a day other than Saturday or Sunday or a federal or State of Oregon
legal holiday.
(5) “Commingle” means the  mixing of funds from any source, including personal funds, with trust
funds as defined in ORS 696.241, by a  licensed real estate property manager or principal real estate
broker, except as specifically authorized by this chapter.
(6) “Compensation” means valuable consideration for services  rendered or to be rendered,
whether contingent or otherwise.
(7) “Competitive market analysis” means a method or process  used by a real estate licensee in
pursuing a listing agreement or in formulating an  offer to acquire real estate in a transaction for
the sale, lease,  lease-option or exchange of real estate. The objective of competitive market analysis
is a recommended listing, selling or purchase price or a lease or rental consideration.  A competitive
market analysis may be expressed as an opinion of the value  of the real estate in a contemplated
transaction. Competitive market analysis may  include but is not limited to an analysis of market
conditions, public records, past transactions and current listings of real estate.
(8) “Expired” means,  in the context of a real estate licensee, that the license has not been re-
newed in a timely manner, but may still be renewed.
(9) “Inactive” means, in the  context of a real estate licensee, that the licensee is not authorized
to engage in professional real estate activity. The inactive status of a  license continues until the
license is reactivated or the license expires or lapses.
(10) “Lapsed” means, in the context of a real estate licensee, that the license has  not been re-
newed in a timely manner and is not eligible for renewal.
(11) “Letter opinion” has the meaning given that term in ORS 696.294.
(12) “Licensed real estate  property manager” means an individual who holds an active real es-
tate property manager’s license issued under ORS 696.022.
(13) “Main office” means the office designated by  a principal real estate broker or licensed real
estate property manager pursuant to ORS 696.200.
(14) “Management of rental real estate” means:
(a) Representing  the owner of real estate under a property management agreement in the rental
or lease of the real estate and includes but is not limited to:
Enrolled House Bill 4058 (HB 4058-A) Page 6
(A) Advertising the real estate for rent or lease;
(B) Procuring prospective tenants to rent or lease the real estate;
(C) Negotiating with prospective tenants;
(D) Accepting deposits from prospective tenants;
(E) Checking the qualifications and creditworthiness of prospective tenants;
(F) Charging and collecting rent or lease payments;
(G) Representing the owner in inspection or repair of the real estate;
(H) Contracting for repair or remodeling of the real estate;
(I) Holding trust funds or property received in managing the real estate  and accounting to the
owner for the funds or property;
(J) Advising the owner regarding renting or leasing the real estate;
(K) Providing staff and services to accommodate the tax reporting and other financial or ac-
counting needs of the real estate;
(L) Providing copies of records of acts performed on behalf of the owner of the real  estate; and
(M) Offering or attempting to do any of the  acts described in this paragraph for the owner of
the real estate; or
(b) Representing a tenant  or prospective tenant when renting or leasing real estate for which
a real estate property manager has a property management agreement  with the owner of the real
estate and includes but is not limited to:
(A) Consulting with tenants or prospective tenants about renting or leasing real estate;
(B) Assisting prospective tenants in renting or leasing real estate;
(C) Assisting prospective tenants in qualifying for renting or leasing real estate;
(D) Accepting deposits or other funds from prospective tenants for renting or  leasing real estate
and holding the funds in trust for the prospective tenants;
(E) Representing tenants or prospective tenants renting or leasing real estate; and
(F) Offering or attempting to do any of the acts described in this  paragraph for a tenant or
prospective tenant.
(15) “Nonlicensed individual” means an individual:
(a) Who has not obtained a real estate license; or
(b) Whose real estate license is lapsed, expired, inactive, suspended, surrendered or revoked.
(16) “Principal real estate broker” means an individual who holds an active license as a princi-
pal real estate broker issued under ORS 696.022.
(17) “Professional real estate activity” means any of the following actions, when engaged  in for
another and for compensation or with  the intention or in the expectation or upon the promise of
receiving or collecting compensation, by any person who:
(a) Sells, exchanges, purchases, rents or leases real estate;
(b) Offers to sell, exchange, purchase, rent or lease real estate;
(c) Negotiates, offers,  attempts or agrees to negotiate the sale, exchange, purchase, rental or
leasing of real estate;
(d) Lists, offers, attempts or agrees to list real estate for sale;
(e) Offers, attempts or  agrees to perform or provide a competitive market analysis or letter
opinion, to represent a taxpayer under ORS 305.239  or 309.100 or to give an opinion in any admin-
istrative or judicial proceeding regarding  the value of real estate for taxation, except when the ac-
tivity is performed by a state certified appraiser or state licensed appraiser;
(f) Auctions, offers, attempts or agrees to auction real estate;
(g) Buys, sells, offers to buy or sell or otherwise deals in options on real estate;
(h) Engages in management of rental real estate;
(i) Purports to be engaged in the  business of buying, selling, exchanging, renting or leasing real
estate;
(j) Assists or directs in the procuring of prospects, calculated to result in the sale,  exchange,
leasing or rental of real estate;
Enrolled House Bill 4058 (HB 4058-A) Page 7
(k) Assists or directs in the negotiation  or closing of any transaction calculated or intended to
result in the sale, exchange, leasing or rental of real estate;
(L) Except as otherwise provided in ORS 696.030 (12), advises, counsels, consults or  analyzes in
connection with real  estate values, sales or dispositions, including dispositions through eminent do-
main procedures;
(m) Advises,  counsels, consults or analyzes in connection with the acquisition or sale of real
estate by an entity if the purpose of the entity is investment in real estate; or
(n) Performs real estate marketing activity as described in ORS 696.600.
(18) “Property management agreement”  means a written contract for the management of rental
real estate between a real estate property manager and the owner of the rental real estate.
(19) “Real estate” includes  leaseholds and licenses to use including, but not limited to, timeshare
estates and timeshare licenses as defined in ORS  94.803, as well as any and every interest or estate
in real property, whether corporeal  or incorporeal, whether freehold or nonfreehold, whether held
separately or in common with  others and whether the real property is situated in this state or
elsewhere.
(20) “Real estate broker” means an individual who holds an active license as  a real estate bro-
ker issued under ORS 696.022.
(21) “Real estate licensee” means an individual  who holds an active license or an active limited
license  as a real estate broker, principal real estate broker or licensed real estate property manager.
(22) “Real estate property manager” means a  real estate licensee who engages in the manage-
ment of rental real estate and is  a licensed real estate property manager, a principal real estate
broker or a real estate broker who is associated with and supervised by a  principal real estate
broker.
(23) “Registered business name” means a name registered with the Real Estate Agency  under
which the individual registering the name engages in professional real estate activity.
SECTION 11.
 ORS 696.581 is amended to read:
696.581. (1) An escrow agent may not accept funds,  property or documents in any escrow
transaction without dated,  written escrow instructions from the principals to the transaction or a
dated executed agreement in writing between the principals to the transaction.
(2) Except as provided in this section,  an escrow agent must follow dated, written escrow in-
structions executed by the principals or a dated  executed written agreement between the principals
to a transaction.
(3) Except as provided in ORS 314.258, an escrow agent may not close an escrow or  disburse
any funds or property in an escrow without obtaining dated, separate escrow instructions in  writing
from the principals to the transaction adequate to administer and close the transaction or,  in the
case of disbursement, to disburse the funds and property.
(4) The following statement or its substantial  equivalent shall appear on or be attached to all
written escrow instructions prepared by  an escrow agent for signature of the principals to a trans-
action. The statement shall be in at  least 10-point bold type. The statement shall either appear im-
mediately above the signatures of the principals or be separately initialed by the principals:
_______________________________________________________________________________________
It is understood by the parties signing the above  or attached instructions that the instructions
are the complete instructions between this firm  as an escrow agent and you as a principal to the
escrow transaction. These instructions may not include all the terms of the agreement  which is the
subject  of  this escrow. Read these instructions carefully, and do not sign them unless they are ac-
ceptable to you.
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(5) An escrow agent may not  solicit or accept any original, amended or supplemental escrow
instructions containing any blank to be filled in after signing. An  escrow agent may not allow any
Enrolled House Bill 4058 (HB 4058-A) Page 8
alteration of original, amended or  supplemental escrow instructions, unless the alteration is signed
or initialed by all principals who signed or initialed the instructions before the alteration.
(6) An escrow agent may accept trust funds, in excess  of earnest money required in transaction
documents to be held, as individual funds of the principal  who has paid them into escrow. Such
individual trust funds may be disbursed with only the separate written instructions of the  principal
who deposited the funds into escrow.
(7) An escrow agent may open a one-sided escrow, as defined by rule by the Real Estate  Com-
missioner, by receiving the funds, property or documents for an  escrow. Such escrow funds may be
disbursed with only the separate written instructions of the principal  who deposited the funds into
escrow.
(8) Except as authorized in ORS 105.475 and section 5 (4) of this 2024  Act , notwithstanding
the requirement for dated, separate escrow instructions to close an escrow or  disburse funds or
property in an escrow, an escrow agent:
(a) May disburse earnest money deposited based  on an agreement of the parties executed after
the initial sales agreement; and
(b) May not impose additional requirements on  the principals to the transaction, including a
requirement that the principals sign a release of liability in favor of the escrow agent.
(9) Notwithstanding any provision of  this section, an escrow agent may disburse funds, property
or documents deposited in escrow in accordance with an order of  a court of competent jurisdiction.
SECTION 12.  ORS 696.730 is amended to read:
696.730. Any court of competent jurisdiction, including a justice court, has full power to hear
any violation of ORS 696.010 to 696.495, 696.600 to 696.785, 696.800 to 696.870 and 696.995 by an
individual licensed under ORS 696.022 , and sections 1 to 9 of this  2024 Act , and, upon finding a
violation, the court may, at  its discretion and in addition to the other penalties imposed, revoke the
license of the individual found to have  violated any provision of ORS 696.010 to 696.495, 696.600 to
696.785, 696.800 to 696.870 and 696.995  and sections 1 to 9 of this 2024 Act . The clerk of the court
shall forward a copy of any order revoking a real estate license to the Real Estate Commissioner.
SECTION 13.
Sections 1 to 9 of this 2024 Act and the amendments to  ORS 696.010, 696.581
and 696.730 by sections 10 to 12 of this 2024 Act apply to contracts entered into on or  after
July 1, 2025.
SECTION 14. Sections 1 to 9 of this 2024 Act and the amendments to  ORS 696.010, 696.581
and 696.730 by sections 10 to 12 of this 2024 Act become operative July 1, 2025.
REAL ESTATE LICENSEES
SECTION 15.  ORS 696.800 is amended to read:
696.800. As used in ORS 696.392, 696.600 to 696.785,  696.800 to 696.870 and 696.995, unless the
context requires otherwise:
(1) “Agent” means:
(a) A principal real estate broker who has entered into:
(A) A listing agreement with a seller;
(B) A [ service contract ] representation agreement  with a buyer to represent the buyer; or
(C) A disclosed limited agency agreement; or
(b) A real estate broker associated with a principal real estate broker  who is authorized to act
as the principal real estate broker’s agent in connection with acts requiring a real  estate license
and to function under the principal real estate broker’s supervision.
(2) “Buyer” means  a potential transferee in a real property transaction, and includes a person
who:
(a) Executes an offer to purchase real property from a seller through an agent; or
(b) Enters into [ an exclusive representation contract or ] a  buyer’s [ service] representation
agreement with an agent, whether or not a sale or transfer of property results.
Enrolled House Bill 4058 (HB 4058-A) Page 9
(3) “Confidential information” means information communicated to an agent by the buyer or
seller of one to four residential units regarding the real property transaction, including but  not
limited to price, terms, financial qualifications or motivation to  buy or sell. “Confidential informa-
tion” does not mean information that:
(a) The buyer instructs the agent to disclose about the buyer to the  seller or the seller instructs
the agent to disclose about the seller to the buyer; and
(b) The agent knows or should know failure  to disclose would constitute fraudulent represen-
tation.
(4) “Disclosed limited agency” means  a real property transaction in which the representation
of a buyer and seller or the representation  of two or more buyers occurs within the same real estate
business.
(5) “Listing agreement” means a contract between an agent and  a seller of real property that
authorizes the agent, in exchange for compensation,  to act on behalf of the seller in offering the real
property for sale or in finding and obtaining a buyer.
(6) “Listing price” means the amount expressed in dollars, specified in the listing  agreement, for
which the seller is willing to sell the real property through the listing agent.
(7) “Offer” means a written proposal executed by a buyer for the sale  or lease of real property.
(8) “Offering price” is the amount expressed in dollars specified in an offer  to purchase for
which the buyer is willing to buy the real property.
(9) “Principal” means the person who has  permitted or directed an agent to act on the
principal’s behalf. In a real property transaction, this generally means the buyer or the seller.
(10) “Purchase” refers to a transaction for the acquisition  of real property by the buyer
from the seller and includes:
(a) Exchanges of real property between the seller and the buyer and third parties; and
(b) Land sales contracts.
[(10)] (11)  “Real property” means any estate in real property, including a condominium as de-
fined in ORS 100.005, a timeshare property  as defined in ORS 94.803 and the granting of an option
or right of first refusal. “Real property”  also includes a manufactured structure, as defined in ORS
446.561, owned by the same person who owns the land upon which  the manufactured structure is
situated. “Real property” does not include a leasehold in real property.
[(11)] (12) “Real property transaction” means a transaction  regarding real property in which an
agent is employed by one or more of the principals to act in that transaction and includes  but is
not limited to listing agreements, buyer’s [ service agreements, exclusive representation contracts ]
representation agreements  and offers to purchase.
(13) “Representation  agreement” means a contract between an agent and buyer of real
property that  authorizes the agent, in exchange for compensation, to act on behalf of the
buyer in purchasing real property or identifying real property for purchase.
[(12)] (14)  “Sale” or “sold”  refers to a transaction for the transfer of real property from the
seller to the buyer and includes:
(a) Exchanges of real property between the seller and the buyer and third parties; and
(b) Land sales contracts.
[(13)] (15) “Seller” means a potential transferor in a real property transaction and includes an
owner:
(a) Who enters into a listing agreement with an agent, whether or not a transfer results; or
(b) Who receives an  offer to purchase real property that the seller owns from an agent acting
on behalf of a buyer.
SECTION 16.
 ORS 696.805 is amended to read:
696.805. (1) A real estate licensee representing a seller in a  transaction is required to act
under a written listing agreement with the seller. The listing agreement must:
(a) Be entered into before the real estate licensee begins offering the property for sale
or making efforts to find or obtain a buyer for the property;
(b) State whether the agreement is exclusive or nonexclusive;
Enrolled House Bill 4058 (HB 4058-A) Page 10
(c) Describe the  legal obligations of a seller’s agent, either directly or by referring to the
initial agency disclosure pamphlet required by ORS 696.820, if such pamphlet has  been pro-
vided to the seller; and
(d) Contain any other additional requirements prescribed by rule by the Real Estate
Commissioner.
(2) A real  estate licensee may not enter into a listing agreement if the duration of the
listing agreement,  including any automatic renewals of the listing agreement, exceeds 24
months.
(3) The requirements of subsections (1) and (2) of  this section do not apply to real estate
licensees when engaged in a transaction for property that is  improved or available for im-
provement by commercial structures or five or more residential dwelling units.
[(1)] (4)  A real estate licensee who acts under a listing agreement with  the seller acts only as
the seller’s agent [ only] in a real estate transaction unless the  seller has agreed in writing for
the listing agent to be a disclosed limited agent pursuant to ORS 696.815 .
[(2)] (5) A seller’s agent owes the seller, other principals and the  principals’ agents involved in
a real estate transaction the following affirmative duties:
(a) To deal honestly and in good faith;
(b) To present all written offers, written notices and other written communications to and  from
the parties in a timely manner without regard to whether the  property is subject to a contract for
sale or the buyer is already a party to a contract to purchase; and
(c) To disclose material facts known by the seller’s agent and not  apparent or readily
ascertainable to a party.
[(3)] (6)  A seller’s agent owes the  seller involved in a real estate transaction the following af-
firmative duties:
(a) To exercise reasonable care and diligence;
(b) To account in a timely manner for money and property  received from or on behalf of the
seller;
(c) To be  loyal to the seller by not taking action that is adverse or detrimental to the seller’s
interest in a transaction;
(d) To disclose  in a timely manner to the seller any conflict of interest, existing or contemplated;
(e) To advise the seller to seek expert advice on matters related to the transaction that  are
beyond the agent’s expertise;
(f) To maintain confidential information from or about the  seller except under subpoena or court
order, even after termination of the agency relationship; and
(g) Unless agreed otherwise in writing, to make a continuous, good faith effort to  find a buyer
for the property, except  that a seller’s agent is not required to seek additional offers to purchase
the property while the property is subject to a contract for sale.
[(4)] (7)  A seller’s agent may show properties owned by another seller to a prospective buyer
and may list competing properties for sale without breaching any affirmative duty to the seller.
[(5)] (8) Except as provided in subsection  [ (3)(g)] (6)(g)  of this section, an affirmative duty may
not be waived.
[(6)] (9) Nothing in this section implies a duty to investigate matters that  are outside the scope
of the real estate licensee’s expertise, including but not limited  to investigation of the condition of
property, the legal status of the title or the owner’s past conformance with  law, unless the licensee
or the licensee’s agent agrees in writing to investigate a matter.
[(7)] (10) In order  to help a seller avoid selecting a buyer based on the buyer’s race, color, re-
ligion, sex, sexual orientation, national origin, marital status or familial status as prohibited by the
Fair Housing Act (42 U.S.C. 3601 et seq.), a seller’s agent  shall reject any communication other than
customary documents in a real estate transaction, including photographs, provided by a buyer.
SECTION 17.
 ORS 696.810 is amended to read:
696.810. (1) A real estate licensee representing a buyer is required to  act under a written
representation agreement with the buyer. The representation agreement must:
Enrolled House Bill 4058 (HB 4058-A) Page 11
(a) Be entered into before, or  as soon as reasonably practicable after, the licensee has
commenced efforts to assist the buyer in purchasing real property or  in identifying real
property for purchase;
(b) State whether the agreement is exclusive or nonexclusive;
(c) Describe the legal obligations of  a buyer’s agent described in this section either di-
rectly or by reference to the initial agency disclosure  pamphlet required under ORS 696.820,
if such pamphlet has been provided to the buyer; and
(d) Contain any other additional requirements prescribed by rule by the Real Estate
Commissioner.
(2) A real estate licensee may not enter into a representation agreement, or a  contract
that would require the buyer to enter into a representation agreement in the future, if the
duration of the representation agreement  or contract, including any automatic renewals of
the representation agreement or contract, exceeds 24 months.
(3) The requirements of subsections (1) and (2) of  this section do not apply to real estate
licensees when engaged in a transaction  for property that is improved or available for im-
provement by commercial structures or five or more residential dwelling units.
[(1)] (4)  A real estate licensee  who acts under a representation  agreement with a buyer
acts only as the buyer’s agent in a real  estate transaction unless the buyer has agreed in
writing for the buyer’s agent to be a disclosed limited agent  pursuant to ORS 696.815  [ other
than the seller’s agent may agree with the buyer to act as the  buyer’s agent only. The buyer’s agent
is not representing the seller ], even if the buyer’s agent is  receiving compensation for services ren-
dered, either in full or in part, from the seller or through the seller’s agent.
[(2)] (5) A buyer’s agent owes the buyer, other principals and the principals’ agents involved in
a real estate transaction the following affirmative duties:
(a) To deal honestly and in good faith;
(b) To present all written offers, written notices and other written communications to and  from
the parties in a timely manner without regard to whether the  property is subject to a contract for
sale or the buyer is already a party to a contract to purchase; and
(c) To disclose material facts known by the buyer’s agent and not apparent or  readily
ascertainable to a party.
[(3)] (6)  A  buyer’s agent owes the buyer involved in a real estate transaction the following af-
firmative duties:
(a) To exercise reasonable care and diligence;
(b) To account in a timely manner for money and property  received from or on behalf of the
buyer;
(c) To be loyal to the buyer by not taking action that is adverse or detrimental to  the buyer’s
interest in a transaction;
(d) To disclose in a timely manner to the buyer any conflict of interest, existing or contemplated;
(e) To  advise the buyer to seek expert advice on matters related to the transaction that are
beyond the agent’s expertise;
(f) To maintain confidential information from or  about the buyer except under subpoena or court
order, even after termination of the agency relationship; and
(g) Unless  agreed otherwise in writing, to make a continuous, good faith effort to find property
for the buyer, except that a buyer’s agent is not required to seek additional properties  for the buyer
while the buyer is subject to  a contract for purchase or to show properties for which there is no
written agreement to pay compensation to the buyer’s agent.
[(4)] (7)  A buyer’s agent may show properties  in which the buyer is interested to other pro-
spective buyers without breaching an affirmative duty to the buyer.
[(5)] (8) Except as provided in subsection  [ (3)(g)] (6)(g)  of this section, an affirmative duty may
not be waived.
[(6)] (9) Nothing in this section implies a duty to investigate matters that  are outside the scope
of the real estate licensee’s expertise, including but not limited  to investigation of the condition of
Enrolled House Bill 4058 (HB 4058-A) Page 12
property, the legal status of the title or the owner’s past conformance with  law, unless the licensee
or the licensee’s agent agrees in writing to investigate a matter.
SECTION 18.  ORS 696.815 is amended to read:
696.815. (1) A real estate licensee may represent both the seller and  the buyer in a real estate
transaction  as a disclosed limited agent  under a disclosed limited agency agreement,  with full
disclosure of the  relationship under the agreement. The real estate licensee must also have a
written listing agreement with the seller  that meets the requirements of ORS 696.805 and a
written representation agreement with the  buyer that meets the requirements of ORS
696.810.
(2) A real estate licensee acting pursuant to a disclosed limited agency agreement has  the fol-
lowing duties and obligations:
(a) To the seller, the duties under ORS 696.805;
(b) To the buyer, the duties under ORS 696.810; and
(c) To both seller and buyer, except with express written permission of  the respective person,
the duty not to disclose to the other person:
(A) That the seller will accept a price lower or terms less favorable than the listing price or
terms;
(B) That the buyer will pay a price greater or terms more favorable than  the offering price or
terms; or
(C) Specific confidential information as defined in ORS 696.800 (3).
(3) Nothing in this  section implies a duty to investigate matters that are outside the scope of
the real estate licensee’s expertise unless the licensee agrees in writing to investigate a matter.
(4) In a real estate transaction in which different real  estate brokers associated with the same
principal real estate broker establish agency relationships with  different parties to the real estate
transaction, the principal real estate broker shall  be the only broker acting as a disclosed limited
agent representing both seller and  buyer. Other brokers shall continue to represent only the party
with whom the broker has an agency relationship unless all parties agree otherwise in writing.
(5) The principal real estate broker and the real estate licensees representing either  seller or
buyer shall owe the following duties to the seller and buyer:
(a) To disclose a conflict of interest in writing to all parties;
(b) To take no action that is adverse or detrimental to either party’s interest in the  transaction;
and
(c) To obey the lawful instructions of both parties.
SECTION 19.
 ORS 696.840 is amended to read:
696.840. The payment of compensation or the obligation  to pay compensation to a real estate
licensee by the seller or  the buyer is not necessarily determinative of a particular agency relation-
ship between a real estate licensee and the seller or the buyer. After  full disclosure of agency re-
lationships, a listing agent, a selling  agent or a real estate licensee or any combination of the three
may agree to  share any compensation paid, or any right to any compensation for which an obli-
gation arises as the result of a real property transaction, and the terms of  the agreement shall not
necessarily be determinative of a particular relationship. Before entering into an agreement  to
share compensation between a listing agent and  a buyer’s agent, the listing agent and
buyer’s agent must disclose to their respective clients the amount and terms of the shared
compensation. Nothing  in this section shall prevent the parties from selecting a relationship not
specifically prohibited by ORS 696.301, 696.392, 696.600 to 696.785, 696.800 to 696.870 and 696.995.
SECTION 20.
Section 21 of this 2024 Act is  added to and made a part of ORS 696.010 to
696.495.
SECTION 21. (1)(a) As used  in this section, “future right to list contract” means a con-
tract granting a right to list, or to refer  to another for listing, residential real estate for sale
in the future  and includes, but is not limited to, any document recorded in the county where
the real estate is located relating  to the contract, including the contract itself, a memoran-
dum concerning the contract, or a deed of trust to secure the terms of the contract.
Enrolled House Bill 4058 (HB 4058-A) Page 13
(b) “Future right to list  contract” does not include a will or trust instrument in which
the testator or settlor  instructs a personal representative or trustee to use the services of
a particular real estate licensee or firm upon the death or incapacity of the testator  or
settlor.
(2) A real estate licensee may not solicit,  enter into or give or receive compensation
arising from a future right to list contract if:
(a) The duration of the contract, including any renewals thereof, exceeds 24 months;
(b) The contract purports to run with the land or to be binding on future owners of in-
terests in the real property;
(c) The  contract allows for assignment of the right to provide service without notice to
and consent of the owner of residential real estate; or
(d) The contract purports  to create a lien, encumbrance or other real property security
interest.
(3) This section does  not apply if the future right to list contract is entered into between
a real estate licensee and a corporation,  limited liability company or partnership and is for
the right to list the real property of the corporation, limited liability company or partnership.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 22.
The unit and section captions used in this 2024 Act are provided only  for
the convenience of the reader  and do not become part of the statutory law of this state or
express any legislative intent in the enactment of this 2024 Act.
Passed by House February 14, 2024
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate February 28, 2024
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4058 (HB 4058-A) Page 14